District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.06

Single risk limit.

(a)

The net retained liability of a title insurer for a single risk in regard to property, whether assumed directly or as reinsurance, shall not exceed the aggregate of 50% of surplus as regards policyholders, plus the statutory premium reserve less the company’s investment in title plants, all as shown in the most recent annual statement of the insurer on file with the Commissioner.

(b)

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

A single risk shall be the insured amount of any title insurance policy; provided, that, if 2 or more title insurance policies are issued simultaneously covering different estates in the same real property, a single risk shall be the sum of the insured amounts of all the title insurance policies.

(2)

A policy under which a claim payment reduces the amount of insurance under one or more other title insurance policies shall be included in computing the single risk sum only to the extent that its amount exceeds the aggregate amount of the policy or policies whose amount of insurance is reduced.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2147, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2147 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).